Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4411
Impoundment fees; payment.

Impoundment fees shall be paid by the owner. Fees for impoundment at public facilities shall be established by the rabies control authority.

Laws 1969, c. 445, § 11, p. 1488.